Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 1 General Provisions
28-1-109. Petition — Verification.

Unless otherwise provided, every application to the court shall be by petition signed and verified by or on behalf of the petitioner.

This requirement shall be mandatory but not jurisdictional, and noncompliance therewith shall not alone be grounds for appeal.

An application to the court within the meaning of §28-40-103 was made when proponents of a will filed a verified petition for probate within three days after death of testator, and a personal appearance before the probate court was not necessary. Minchew v. Tullis, 236 Ark. 818, 368 S.W.2d 282 (1963).

Where there is no order or rule, a court does not err in permitting appellees to dictate a response into the record, for this section requires objections to a petition to be filed in writing only when the court so requires by a special order or general rule. Coogler v. Dorn, 231 Ark. 188, 328 S.W.2d 506 (1959).

Where a petition for determination of heirship under §28-53-101 was filed in July 1980, and the executor filed his response in September 1980, beyond the 20-day period provided for in ARCP 12, but before the hearing, it was proper for the probate judge to deny petitioner's motion to strike the response, since objections by the defendant are not governed by ARCP 12, in probate proceedings and may be made at any time, up to and including the day of the hearing, unless a special order or general rule of the court under this section requires a written objection as a prerequisite to the arguments being heard by the court. King v. King, 273 Ark. 55, 616 S.W.2d 483 (1981).

Where a person for whom a guardian was appointed as being insane was subsequently adjudged to be sane, a suit for an accounting against the guardian was not within the exclusive jurisdiction of the probate court, but could be maintained in the chancery court. Smith v. Walker, 187 Ark. 161, 58 S.W.2d 946 (1933) (decision under prior law).

Probate court had no jurisdiction of a proceeding to determine the issue of a convicted felon's sanity where he was in custody of the law for execution. Ferguson v. Martineau, 115 Ark. 317, 171 S.W. 472 (1914) (decision under prior law).

In suit to redeem property sold for delinquent taxes, a chancery court had authority to determine plaintiff's mental status, irrespective of any previous adjudication by the probate court, which would be prima facie evidence. Schuman v. Westbrook, 207 Ark. 495, 181 S.W.2d 470 (1944) (decision under prior law).

Because an attorney-ad-litem had performed the services requested by a circuit court and the circuit court had already rendered a ruling in the case, an attorney's argument on appeal that the circuit court lacked authority to appoint an attorney-ad-litem in a case involving a petition for ante-mortem probate was moot.Sanford v. Murdoch, 374 Ark. 12, 285 S.W.3d 620 (2008).

Cited: Ozment v. Mann, 235 Ark. 901, 363 S.W.2d 129 (1962); Coleman v. Coleman, 257 Ark. 404, 520 S.W.2d 239 (1975); McDermott v. McAdams, 273 Ark. 20, 616 S.W.2d 476 (1981).

By delivering a copy personally to a person, if a natural person, and, if a corporation or a partnership, by delivering a copy to an individual upon whom civil process may be legally served in behalf of the corporation or partnership at least ten (10) days prior to the date set for the hearing;

By leaving a copy at the usual place of abode of the person being served with some person over fifteen (15) years of age who is a member of his or her family, the notice to be served by an officer authorized to serve process in civil actions at least ten (10) days prior to the date set for the hearing;

By registered mail, requesting a return receipt signed by addressee only, addressed to the person to be served located in the United States at his or her address stated in the petition for the hearing, to be posted by depositing in any United States Post Office in this state at least fifteen (15) days prior to the date set for the hearing;

By publishing one (1) time a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published and having a general circulation in the county, with the first day of publication to be at least fifteen (15) days prior to the date set for the hearing.

In addition, when service by publication only is employed, all persons whose names and addresses appear in the petition shall be served by ordinary mail, bearing on the envelope the return address of the clerk, in the same time and manner as provided in subdivision (b)(3) of this section with respect to notice by registered mail, except that no registration shall be required;

By any combination of two (2) or more of the methods set out in subdivisions (b)(1)-(4) of this section; or

By any method of service allowed by the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.

Personal service may be made in any part of this state and, except as provided by subdivision (b)(2) of this section, may be made by any person not an incompetent.

Service Upon an Incompetent Person.Except when otherwise expressly provided by statute with reference to a particular proceeding, notice to an incompetent person shall be served as follows:

If he or she is a minor under fourteen (14) years of age, service shall be upon the parent, or person in loco parentis, having custody or control of the minor;

If he or she is mentally incompetent and is confined in a hospital or institution for the treatment or care of mentally incompetent persons, service shall be upon the superintendent or acting superintendent of the hospital or institution. It shall be the superintendent's duty to promptly deliver or communicate the notice to the incompetent person; or

If he or she is a mentally incompetent person who is not confined in a hospital or institution for the treatment or care of mentally incompetent persons, but is in the care or under the control of a spouse of the incompetent person or of a person related to the incompetent person within the third degree of consanguinity, then service may be upon the spouse or near relative whose duty it shall be to deliver or communicate the notice to the incompetent person; and

In proceedings in which the interests of the incompetent person are adverse to the interests of his or her guardian, notice shall be served upon the incompetent person as provided in cases in which there is no guardian.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

Ark. L. Rev.

Probate Code Amendments, 5 Ark. L. Rev. 377.

Notices under the Probate Code, 8 Ark. L. Rev. 324.

Although appellant argued that there was no evidence that anyone received notice of the hearing set on the final accounting, which appellant claimed violated this section, the argument was without merit, given the notices that the trial court sent out after excluding appellant from distribution of the estate, and appellant conceded to having received actual notice in any event and possibly not having been entitled to notice in the first place; because appellant had been excluded, she was not an interested person under §28-1-102(11) and so there was no legal requirement that she be served notice, and she lacked standing to complain about the failure to send notice to others who had not appealed.Seymour v. Biehslich, 371 Ark. 359, 266 S.W.3d 722 (2007).

Substantial compliance with the requirements of law for the presentation of claims is sufficient. Merritt v. Rollins, 231 Ark. 384, 329 S.W.2d 544 (1959).

There was substantial compliance with this section where, though county clerk did not notify executor of claim against estate by registered mail as provided by §28-50-104, her attorney received a copy of the claim within the statutory period for notice. Edwards v. Brimm, 236 Ark. 588, 367 S.W.2d 433 (1963).

On the question of whether service on a court-appointed attorney for an absent military mother was sufficient service of process in a case of continuing jurisdiction on the issues of custody and guardianship, it was undisputed that service was made on the mother's attorney of record, and thus, the service of notice was in compliance with subsection (e) of this section. Finney v. Cook, 351 Ark. 367, 94 S.W.3d 333 (2002).

Issue raised by an attorney regarding violation of his due-process rights allegedly resulting from a circuit court's appointment of an attorney-ad-litem without notice, without a hearing, and without adequate time to respond would have had no practical effect on the controversy, would have been purely advisory, and was moot because the attorney-ad-litem had performed the services requested by the circuit court and the circuit court had already rendered a ruling in the case.Sanford v. Murdoch, 374 Ark. 12, 285 S.W.3d 620 (2008).

A party contesting a will voluntarily submitted to the jurisdiction of the probate court by requesting in writing that notice by ordinary mail of any petition, motion, or other filing of any kind be sent to his attorney. Gibbins v. Hancock, 267 Ark. 298, 590 S.W.2d 280 (1979).

Cited: Burdette v. Dietz, 18 Ark. App. 107, 711 S.W.2d 178 (1986).

Service on Attorney.If there is an attorney of record for a party in a proceeding or matter pending in the court, all notices required to be served on the party in the proceeding or matter shall be served on the attorney, and this service shall be in lieu of service upon the party for whom the attorney appears.

Proof of Publication.When notice by publication in a newspaper or by posting is required by the Probate Code or by the court, proof thereof shall be made as provided by law in civil proceedings.

Costs of Notice.All expense incurred in giving notice under the provisions of the Probate Code shall be taxed as costs in the proceeding.

A person who submits to the jurisdiction of the court in any hearing shall be deemed to have waived notice.

A waiver in writing, executed in person or by attorney, in behalf of a person who is interested in a hearing in a probate proceeding, shall be effective if made by:

A consul or other representative of a foreign government whose appearance has been entered as provided by law in behalf of a person residing in a foreign country.

A waiver, executed by a competent person in his or her own behalf or by his or her attorney, by its terms, may include one (1) or more hearings in a particular probate proceeding.

Ark. L. Rev.

Probate Code Amendments, 5 Ark. L. Rev. 377.

Notices under the Probate Code, 8 Ark. L. Rev. 324.

Personal waiver of successor guardian who was not a party to the action, in her own behalf, did not bar the guardian from challenging the order on behalf of ward where her personal waiver was executed prior to her appointment as successor guardian. Smart v. Biggs, 26 Ark. App. 141, 760 S.W.2d 882 (1988).

Circuit court did not clearly err when it found that appellant's waiver of notice as written applied to “all proceedings” and that appellant did not intend it to be limited to only proceedings that involved the appointment of his parents as guardians to his children, as opposed to other persons; although appellant could have limited under the statute his waiver to waive notice only of specific hearings, he failed to do so.Paschall v. Paschall, 2018 Ark. App. 514, 563 S.W.3d 592 (2018).

A party contesting a will voluntarily submitted to the jurisdiction of the probate court by requesting in writing that notice by ordinary mail of any petition, motion, or other filing of any kind be sent to his attorney. Gibbins v. Hancock, 267 Ark. 298, 590 S.W.2d 280 (1979).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning rules of procedure and forms for probate courts, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 272. The section was derived from Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 4, 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2007.

Ark. L. Rev.

Mark James Chaney, Recent Developments: Arkansas Supreme Court Holds the Appointment of a Special Personal Representative to an Estate Is Voidable, but Not Void, upon the Discovery of a Disqualifying Characteristic, 66 Ark. L. Rev. 1145 (2013).

This section was designed to afford a probate court greater flexibility with regard to the finality of its orders in the process of administration of an estate. White v. Toney, 37 Ark. App. 36, 823 S.W.2d 921 (1992).

Probate court did not err in reopening a decedent's estate in order to reform the probate file and a deed to show that real property was conveyed to purchasers with a reservation of one-half the mineral rights on each tract of land because the president of the bank that administered the estate testified that one-half of the mineral rights were not to be sold to purchasers, and his testimony was supported by the evidence; this section was inapplicable and did not limit §28-53-119 because this section did not speak to reopening the estate, which was authorized by §28-53-119.Moore v. First Presbyterian Church of Searcy, Ark., Inc., 2010 Ark. App. 269 (2010).

The probate court's dismissal of will contest was necessarily with prejudice; any reconsideration of the dismissal must therefore relate to the dismissal itself and not to the merits of the will contest. Brantley v. Davis, 305 Ark. 68, 805 S.W.2d 75 (1991).

Good cause to vacate previous order of court to sell property to pay claim exists where claim is barred by lapse of time under §28-50-101. Brooks v. Baker, 242 Ark. 128, 412 S.W.2d 271 (1967).

Where a contest of will had already been filed at time will was admitted to probate, there was no time period in which contest had to be filed, and court could vacate or modify its order admitting will to probate, for good cause, at any time within period allowed for appeal after final termination of administration of estate. Even if court had felt admitting will to probate was res judicata on validity of will, it could have vacated its order because probate case was still open. Carpenter v. Horace Mann Life Ins. Co., 21 Ark. App. 112, 730 S.W.2d 502 (1987).

The record was void of any evidence for appellate review of whether good cause existed to vacate dismissal of will contest pursuant to subsection (a) where appellant offered no explanation of why “newly discovered” evidence was not offered prior to dismissal. Brantley v. Davis, 305 Ark. 68, 805 S.W.2d 75 (1991).

Probate judge did not err in failing to find good cause to vacate order, which had found woman to be natural daughter of decedent, on basis of newly discovered evidence that woman was not natural daughter of decedent where there was no satisfactory explanation offered to show why this evidence could not have been obtained prior to entry of the order. Cobb v. Estate of Keown, 53 Ark. App. 171, 920 S.W.2d 501 (1996).

Probate court had jurisdiction to set aside its previous order determining heirship, because there was an extended period during which courts had jurisdiction to modify or vacate orders in probate proceedings, there had not been a final termination of the proceedings, and it was not entirely clear that the order determining heirship would have ended the proceedings.McVesting, LLC v. Heirs of Macie McGoon, 2012 Ark. App. 541 (2012).

Circuit court had the authority to set aside the order granting a petition for approval to make final distribution and determine heirship because the vacated order did not terminate the estate, and thereby, did not fulfill the requirements of this statute.Grant v. Williams, 2013 Ark. App. 663, 430 S.W.3d 786 (2013).

The fact that appellant did not appeal from an order under the commissioner's report as to the value of homestead under the provisions of §28-39-203, prior to the probate court's final order, even though they might have done so, did not constitute a bar to a later appeal. Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

Notwithstanding the provisions of ARCP 60, subsection (a) allows a probate court to vacate or modify its orders at any time before the time for appeal has elapsed after the final termination of the estate. White v. Toney, 37 Ark. App. 36, 823 S.W.2d 921 (1992).

A probate order may be vacated or modified at any time before a final order is entered, notwithstanding the dictates of Ark. R. Civ. P. Rule 60(b). Snowden v. Riggins, 70 Ark. App. 1, 13 S.W.3d 598 (2000).

In accordance with Ark. R. Civ. P. 81, it is precisely because the probate code and the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure set forth different time limits on the court's authority to modify or vacate prior orders that this section applies in probate proceedings; thus, an appeal under §28-1-116 was timely since Ark. R. Civ. P. 52 was not implicated in an appeal from a denial of reconsideration arising from a denial of intervention in a probate case. Helena Reg'l Med. Ctr. v. Wilson, 362 Ark. 117, 207 S.W.3d 541 (2005).

Appointment of an unpardoned felon as a personal representative was voidable, rather than void ab initio, because (1) subsection (b) of this section states that no vacation of a probate court order affects a prior act, (2) §28-48-105(b) states that removing a personal representative does not invalidate prior official acts, and (3) §28-48-102(d)(2) also provides that a personal representative's acts before removal are valid.In re Estate of L.C. Taylor v. MCSA, LLC, 2013 Ark. 429, 430 S.W.3d 120 (2013).

Cited: Alexander v. First Nat'l Bank, 278 Ark. 406, 646 S.W.2d 684 (1983).

Removing a fiduciary for failure to give a new bond or to render an account as required by the court; or

Appointing a special administrator.

Stayed until the order of final distribution is made; and

Heard only as a part of any appeal which may be taken from the order of final distribution.

This subsection shall not apply to guardianships.

When Appeal from Order of Final Distribution Includes Appeal from Prior Orders.When an appeal is taken from the order of final distribution in the administration of a decedent's estate, all prior appealable orders and judgments to which the appellant has filed objections in writing within sixty (60) days after the order of judgment was rendered and from which an appeal has not been taken, except orders admitting or denying the probate of a will or appointing a personal representative, shall be reviewed at the election of the appellant. The appellant shall indicate the election by clearly stating in the appeal the orders which he or she desires to have reviewed.

Stay.

An appeal shall stay other proceedings in the circuit court except when and to the extent that the court finds that no interested person will be prejudiced and by order permits other proceedings to be had.

An order granting an allowance to the widow of minor children of a decedent pending settlement of the estate or setting apart exempt personal property to them shall not be stayed by an appeal.

When Fiduciary Not Required to Give Supersedeas Bond.No supersedeas bond shall be required of a fiduciary when, in any probate matter, he or she appeals on behalf of his or her ward or the estate.

Except as otherwise provided in the Probate Code, the provisions as to time, manner, notice, appeal bonds, stays, scope of review, duties of the clerk, and all other matters relating to appellate review shall be determined by the law and rules applicable to appeals in equity cases.

The transcript on appeal shall be compiled in the same manner and consist of the same material as prescribed by law for appeals in equity cases.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2003, No. 1885, § 273, purported to amend this section in its entirety, but did not set out subsections (f) and (g) as expressly repealed. The Arkansas Code Revision Commission does not construe the omission of subsections (f) and (g) by Acts 2003, No 1885, § 273, as an implied repeal of those subsections. Accordingly, subsections (f) and (g) have been included in this section as set out above.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

Ark. L. Rev.

Minimum Standards of Judicial Administration — Arkansas, 5 Ark. L. Rev. 1, 22.

This section provides for appeals from probate causes involving wills, estates, and fiduciary relationships; it was enacted in 1949 and was in effect at the time ARAP 2 was adopted and, therefore, determines whether there is a right of appeal in a case involving orders of the probate court. Pickens v. Black, 316 Ark. 499, 872 S.W.2d 405 (1994).

Law and rules applicable to appeals from equity courts apply equally to appeals from probate court, except as otherwise provided in the probate code. In re Vesa, 319 Ark. 574, 892 S.W.2d 491 (1995).

Right to review by the Supreme Court lies from all probate court orders other than an order removing a fiduciary for failure to give a new bond or render an accounting required by the court, or an order appointing a special administrator. In re Vesa, 319 Ark. 574, 892 S.W.2d 491 (1995).

Because a right to review lies from all probate orders other than an order removing a fiduciary for failure to give bond or to render a required accounting or an order appointing a special administrator under subsections (a) and (b) of this section, claimant's appeal from the order denying the motion to enter an order was properly before the court.Smith v. Estate of Howell, 372 Ark. 186, 272 S.W.3d 106 (2008).

Decedent’s son’s appeal was dismissed because prior to a hearing on the admission of the will to probate, he executed a waiver and entry of appearance and a disclaimer of his interest in the decedent’s estate, did not file a notice of appeal of an order staying the matter until a final distribution was made, and despite the denial of his motion to supplement the record, he included in his addendum materials found only in the supplemental volume and did not include certain necessary documents.Stratton v. Stratton, 2014 Ark. App. 292 (2014).

In adoption proceedings, appellate court reviews the record de novo, but will not reverse the probate judge's decision unless it is clearly erroneous or against a preponderance of the evidence, after giving due regard to his opportunity to determine the credibility of the witnesses. Chrisos v. Egleston, 7 Ark. App. 82, 644 S.W.2d 326 (1983).

Where the plaintiffs filed an action against the administrator prior to his resignation as administrator, plaintiffs were interested parties within the meaning of subdivision (11) of §28-1-102 and aggrieved parties within the meaning of this section for purposes of appealing from probate orders that affected those proceedings, but as such a resignation was ordinarily a matter of discretion for the probate judge and, as such resignation had no effect on venue and §28-48-107 gave plaintiffs a remedy for the appointment of another administrator, there was no abuse of discretion in allowing the resignation to stand. Barkley v. Cullum, 252 Ark. 474, 479 S.W.2d 535 (1972).

Circuit court did not err in appointing a sister as guardian over her sibling, an incapacitated adult, because the circuit court acted with its authority when it continued to enter orders while a brother's appeal was pending; the circuit court faced changed circumstances that called for immediate action because it was grappling with a situation in which the terms of its orders had not been fulfilled, and subdivision (e)(1) of this section did not preclude the circuit court from exercising that kind of judicial authority.Kuelbs v. Hill, 2010 Ark. App. 793, 379 S.W.3d 716 (2010), review denied, — Ark. —, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Ark. LEXIS 284 (Ark. June 2, 2011).

Because a guardianship case, like a child-custody or child-support case, involves ongoing events in the life of a person who is dependent on the court for protection, the court must continually exercise its powers, where changed conditions warrant, to safeguard those persons whose needs cannot wait a year or more while an appeal makes its way through the courts.Kuelbs v. Hill, 2010 Ark. App. 793, 379 S.W.3d 716 (2010), review denied, — Ark. —, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Ark. LEXIS 284 (Ark. June 2, 2011).

Since an appellate review is de novo under the provisions of subsection (g) of this section, improperly excluded evidence will be considered. Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

Although not specifically enumerated in §28-1-104, an appellate court had jurisdiction over a request to exhume a body because the decedent's personal representative petitioned the probate division of the circuit court, during administration of the decedent's estate, to enforce a provision in the decedent's will by ordering exhumation and reburial and probate orders were appealable pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and Ark. R. App. P.-Civ. 2(a)(12).Long v. Alford, 2010 Ark. App. 233, 374 S.W.3d 219 (2010).

Once a person's incompetency is established, that incompetency is presumed to continue until a change has been established by proof. In reviewing the probate court's finding on whether a change has been established, an appellate court affirms unless the court's decision is clearly erroneous, giving due regard to the opportunity of the trial court to judge the credibility of the witnesses. In re Estate of Lemley, 9 Ark. App. 140, 653 S.W.2d 141 (1983).

Probate court had jurisdiction to set aside its previous order determining heirship, because there was an extended period during which courts had jurisdiction to modify or vacate orders in probate proceedings, there had not been a final termination of the proceedings, and it was not entirely clear that the order determining heirship would have ended the proceedings.McVesting, LLC v. Heirs of Macie McGoon, 2012 Ark. App. 541 (2012).

In an appeal from an order appointing a permanent guardian of the person and estate of appellant's husband, the circuit court was without jurisdiction to appoint special administrators to act on appellant's behalf following her death after the record was lodged on appeal. Because the appeal did not have an appellant to prosecute the appeal, it was dismissed.Guenther v. Guenther, 2018 Ark. App. 538, 566 S.W.3d 132 (2018) (petition for special administrators was filed before the January 1, 2018 effective date of Ark. R. App. P. Civil 12).

An order of the probate court upon subject matter and between parties over which it has jurisdiction remains binding upon all parties interested therein until it is set aside under proper procedure. Sides v. Haynes, 181 F. Supp. 889 (W.D. Ark. 1960).

Appeal from a motion to increase distribution was not an appeal from the final order of distribution, and had nothing to do with the manner of administration; rather, it was an attempt to appeal for the second time an earlier order denying probate of the codicil and denying that the church disclaimed its interest, and was barred by subsection (d) of this section and the doctrine of res judicata. Simmons v. Estate of Wilkinson, 318 Ark. 371, 885 S.W.2d 673 (1994).

Under this section, any order of a probate court is generally appealable, but under §28-48-103(f), there can be no appeal from an order appointing or refusing to appoint a special administrator; however, the denial or granting of a petition to remove an executor or administrator, other than a special administrator, is an appealable order. Pickens v. Black, 316 Ark. 499, 872 S.W.2d 405 (1994).

Because a circuit court had not yet ruled on the merits of a daughter's petition for guardianship over the person and estate of her mother, and because additional evidence was expected when a hearing resumed, evidentiary challenges were not yet ripe for review on the mother's appeal of the circuit court's order requiring an independent medical evaluation.Howard v. Jenkins, 2019 Ark. App. 15, 568 S.W.3d 771 (2019).

When an appeal is taken from the order of final distribution, all prior appealable judgments and orders to which the appellant has filed an objection within sixty days after the order of judgment was rendered, with certain exceptions, may be reviewed on appeal. Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

Where heirs at law attacked probate of will and filed petitions asking for removal of executor on the ground that he failed to include certain assets in the inventory and, while matters were pending, the probate court granted a petition for appointment of a special administrator for purpose of filing proceedings against executors and others, the appointment of a special administrator was proper since probate court had original and exclusive jurisdiction to appoint a special administrator. Breshears v. Williams, 223 Ark. 368, 265 S.W.2d 956 (1954).

No appeal is allowed from an order refusing to appoint a special administrator. In re Estate of McLaughlin, 306 Ark. 515, 815 S.W.2d 937 (1991).

There can be no appeal from an order refusing to appoint a special administrator. Harwood v. Monroe, 65 Ark. App. 57, 984 S.W.2d 93 (1999).

Pursuant to subsection (e), court's failure to make a finding of lack of prejudice and issue an order permitting additional proceedings prohibited the court from proceeding further where action was stayed by appeal. National Union Fire Ins. Co. v. Standridge, 299 Ark. 91, 771 S.W.2d 22 (1989).

By declining to determine the appellants' heirship claims, the probate court did not impliedly stay any appeal of its order until final distribution; the court's order gave no indication of any intent to curtail the appellants' right to appeal, but only to clarify and restrict the scope of the order and, additionally, the order appealed from was largely concerned with the appointment of a personal representative and thus was not encompassed by subsection (c) of this section. Snowden v. Riggins, 70 Ark. App. 1, 13 S.W.3d 598 (2000).

In response to a jurisdictional argument under subdivision (e)(1) of this section, an appellate court considered a recusal argument in a probate matter out of an abundance of caution, even though there were no specific findings of no prejudice or a specific order permitting further proceedings in the order of a companion case.Ashley v. Ashley, 2012 Ark. App. 230 (2012).

Appeal could not be taken four months after collateral heirs were notified of hearing on final accounting and final accounting was approved and published. Wilson v. Davis, 239 Ark. 305, 389 S.W.2d 442 (1965).

In accordance with Ark. R. Civ. P. 81, it is precisely because the probate code and the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure set forth different time limits on the court's authority to modify or vacate prior orders that §28-1-115 applies in probate proceedings; thus, an appeal under this section was timely since Ark. R. Civ. P. 52 was not implicated in an appeal from a denial of reconsideration arising from a denial of intervention in a probate case. Helena Reg'l Med. Ctr. v. Wilson, 362 Ark. 117, 207 S.W.3d 541 (2005).

Appeals from a circuit court's order construing a decedent's will in the widow's favor were timely, under subsections (a) and (g) of this section, because (1) any attempt to appeal from the partial summary judgment would have been a nullity because the partial summary judgment lacked finality because it was obviously partial and other issues remained, and the partial summary judgment did not contain an Ark. R. Civ. P. 54(b) certification allowing for an immediate appeal; (2) the partial summary judgment became final on July 31, 2006, when judgment was entered disposing of the remaining claims; (3) motions for new trial were filed and, under Ark. R. App. P. Civ. 4(b), such motions extended the time for all parties to file their notice of appeal; and (4) the older children filed their notice of appeal on September 18, 2006.Taylor v. Woods, 102 Ark. App. 92, 282 S.W.3d 285 (2008), rehearing denied, — Ark. App. —, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Ark. App. LEXIS 625 (Aug. 20, 2008).

Because the notice of appeal by the trustee of the residuary beneficiary was timely filed within 30 days from entry of the circuit court's interlocutory order on Oct. 19, 2017, the appellate court had jurisdiction over the appeal and could review the circuit court's failure to enforce a family-settlement agreement. However, the appellate court did not have jurisdiction to hear a cross-appeal advancing a challenge to the family-settlement agreement because the contingent beneficiary did not file a notice of appeal within 30 days from the entry of the court's June 2, 2017, interlocutory order approving the family-settlement agreement.Trask v. Trask, 2018 Ark. App. 400, 559 S.W.3d 277 (2018).

Where an order of the probate court on May 18, 1978, assigned dower and homestead rights to the widow and directed that certain other payments be made to her, the order was final as to dower and homestead rights and was an appealable order, so that, whether the 30-day (§16-67-310 [superseded]) or 60-day (§28-1-116) time limit for appeals was applicable, the executor's appeal was not timely when he appealed from an order of May 15, 1979, wherein the court directed compliance with its former order of May 18, 1978. Owen v. Owen, 267 Ark. 532, 592 S.W.2d 120 (1980).

Appealability of court order held not preserved. Morris v. Garmon, 291 Ark. 67, 722 S.W.2d 571 (1987), cert. denied, 484 U.S. 816, 108 S. Ct. 69 (1987).

Court lacked jurisdiction to address the claimant's argument that the circuit court erred in approving the settlement, where the claimant neither filed an objection pursuant to subsection (d) of this section to preserve the issue as part of the appeal from the order of final distribution, nor did he file a timely notice of appeal to appeal the order separately.Smith v. Estate of Howell, 372 Ark. 186, 272 S.W.3d 106 (2008).

Former attorney's appeal from a probate court's order striking the former attorney's response to a motion for modification and declaratory judgment and discovery requests was dismissed with prejudice because (1) the order striking the response was the only issue raised on appeal, (2) the order striking the response was an appealable order, under Ark. R. App. P. Civ. 2(a)(4), (3) the order striking the response was not reviewable under subsection (d) of this section as being an appealable order entered prior to a final order of distribution, as no final order of distribution meeting the requirements of §28-53-104 was entered, (4) even if the contested order were viewed as an order of a probate court, rather than an order striking a response, the appeal was still untimely, as the order was appealable at the interlocutory stage, under Ark. R. App. P. Civ. 2(a)(12) and this section, and (5) the appeal was not timely filed under Ark. R. App. P. Civ. 4(a).Brown v. Wilson (In re Estate of Stinnett), 2011 Ark. 278, 383 S.W.3d 357 (2011).

Contestant's failure to file written objections to orders concerning unpaid rent and executor and attorney fees precluded appellate review. Swaffar v. Swaffar, 327 Ark. 235, 938 S.W.2d 552 (1997), cert. denied, 522 U.S. 820, 118 S. Ct. 73 (1997).

Cited: Black v. Morton, 233 Ark. 197, 343 S.W.2d 437 (1961); Brooks v. Baker, 242 Ark. 128, 412 S.W.2d 271 (1967); Knight v. Deavers, 259 Ark. 45, 531 S.W.2d 252, 78 A.L.R.3d 761 (1976); Hanna v. Hanna, 273 Ark. 399, 619 S.W.2d 655 (1981); Monroe v. Dallas, 6 Ark. App. 10, 636 S.W.2d 881 (1982); Widmer v. Widmer, 293 Ark. 296, 737 S.W.2d 457 (1987); Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs. v. Lopez, 302 Ark. 154, 787 S.W.2d 686 (1990); White v. Welsh, 323 Ark. 479, 915 S.W.2d 274 (1996); Dunklin v. Ramsay, 328 Ark. 263, 944 S.W.2d 76 (1997); Guess v. Going, 62 Ark. App. 19, 966 S.W.2d 930 (1998); West v. Williams, 355 Ark. 148, 133 S.W.3d 388 (2003); Ferguson v. Ferguson, 2009 Ark. App. 549, 334 S.W.3d 425 (2009); Grant v. Williams, 2013 Ark. App. 663, 430 S.W.3d 786 (2013).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2010.

28-1-110. Filing objections to petition.

On or before the day set for hearing, an interested person may file written objections to a petition previously filed.

Upon special order or general rule of the court, objections to a petition must be filed in writing as a prerequisite to being heard by the court.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2011.

28-1-111. Guardians and attorneys ad litem.

Circuit courts shall have the power and duty to appoint a guardian ad litem to a proceeding to represent an incompetent party who is not represented by a guardian or next friend and, for the protection of the interests of a nonresident party who is not represented before the court and has not been personally served with notice, to appoint an attorney ad litem to give notice to the nonresident of the pendency and nature of the proceeding as is provided by law with respect to proceedings in courts of equity.

The appointment of a guardian ad litem or attorney ad litem may be made by the clerk of the court at any time after the initiation of a proceeding by the filing of a petition, subject to the approval of the court.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2004.

28-1-112. Notice — Service — Proof — Costs.

When Notice to Be Given.Notice to interested persons need be given only when and as specifically provided for in the Probate Code or as ordered by the court. When no notice is required by the Probate Code, the court, by rule or by order in a particular case, may require such notice as it deems desirable.

Kinds of Notice Required.Unless waived and except as otherwise provided by law, and subject to rule of the court or order of the court in a particular case specifying which of the following types of service shall be employed, notices required by the Probate Code may be served either:

(c)

By Whom Prepared, Signed, and Served.

Except when by statute or by order of the court otherwise expressly provided, a notice in a probate proceeding shall be in writing or print and prepared by or by procurement of the party upon whom rests the burden of giving the notice and shall be signed by the clerk or the attorney for the party upon whom rests the burden of giving notice. If service is to be by mail, the person preparing the notice shall sign it or deliver it to the clerk properly prepared for the clerk's signature.

(A)In the case of notices served by registered or certified mail, the clerk or the attorney of record in a probate proceeding for the party upon whom rests the burden of giving notice pursuant to this section may deposit the notices in the United States mail, cause the receipts for the delivery of the certified or registered mail to be returned to the clerk or the attorney, and duly prove service by the execution and filing with the clerk of the statement prescribed in subsection (f) of this section.

Upon the guardian, if any, of the estate of the incompetent person if the proceedings affect his or her estate, and upon the guardian, if any, of the person of the incompetent person if the proceedings affect the control or custody of his or her person;

If there is no guardian of the estate or of the person upon whom notice may appropriately be served, service shall be upon the incompetent person, except:

(f)

Proof of Service.

Proof of service of notice, otherwise than by publication in a newspaper or posting, shall be made by filing with the clerk a copy of the notice which has endorsed thereon a statement naming the person or persons upon whom it was served, the time, place, and manner of service, and is signed by the person who served the notice. This certificate of notice shall be sworn to unless signed by an officer authorized by law to serve civil process, or signed by the clerk or by an attorney of this state.

In the case of service by registered mail, the return receipt shall be attached to the proof of service if a receipt has been received. If no receipt has been received, the court, in its discretion, may order further service on the party.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 12; 1951, No. 255, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2012; Acts 1995, No. 734, § 1; 2001, No. 240, § 1.